New York, session 2025-2026, A1896.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3309 of the public health law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 10 to read as follows: 3 10. The commissioner, in consultation with municipal police training 4 council and the superintendent of state police, shall develop a training 5 program and associated training materials, to provide instruction and 6 information to police officers and emergency medical services personnel 7 on protocols for response to victims of suspected drug overdose and the 8 administration of opioid antagonists. 9 § 2. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 3055 to 10 read as follows: 11 § 3055. Opioid overdose prevention. The commissioner shall provide the 12 training program relating to protocols for response to victims of 13 suspected drug overdose and the administration of opioid antagonists 14 pursuant to section thirty-three hundred nine of this chapter to all 15 emergency medical services personnel including, but not limited to, 16 first responders, emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency 17 medical technicians and emergency vehicle operators. 18 § 3. Section 840 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 19 subdivision 8 to read as follows: 20 8. The council shall, in addition: 21 (a) Develop, maintain and disseminate, in consultation with the 22 commissioner of health, written policies and procedures consistent with 23 section thirty-three hundred nine of the public health law, regarding EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05195-01-5 A. 1896 2 1 protocols for response to victims of suspected drug overdose and the 2 administration of opioid antagonists. Such policies and procedures shall 3 make provisions for the education and training of new and veteran police 4 officers on the protocols for response to victims of suspected drug 5 overdose and the administration of opioid antagonists; and 6 (b) Recommend to the governor, rules and regulations with respect to 7 the establishment and implementation on an ongoing basis of a training 8 program for all current and new police officers regarding the policies 9 and procedures established pursuant to this subdivision, along with 10 recommendations for periodic retraining of police officers. 11 § 4. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 214-j to 12 read as follows: 13 § 214-j. Opioid overdose prevention. The superintendent shall, for all 14 members of the state police: 15 1. Develop, maintain and disseminate, in consultation with the commis- 16 sioner of health, written policies and procedures consistent with 17 section thirty-three hundred nine of the public health law, regarding 18 protocols for response to victims of suspected drug overdose and the 19 administration of opioid antagonists. Such policies and procedures shall 20 make provisions for the education and training of new and veteran police 21 officers on the protocols for response to victims of suspected drug 22 overdose and the administration of opioid antagonists; and 23 2. Recommend to the governor, rules and regulations with respect to 24 establishment and implementation on an ongoing basis of a training 25 program for all current and new police officers regarding the policies 26 and procedures established pursuant to this subdivision, along with 27 recommendations for periodic retraining of police officers. 28 § 5. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 29 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 30 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 31 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 32 completed on or before such effective date.